Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-187
Thurston.

The county of Thurston is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point where the west boundary of the Omaha Indian reservation intersects the south line of section thirty-four, township twenty-five, north, range five, east of the sixth principal meridian; thence east to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, range seven, east; thence south to the south line of the Omaha Indian reservation as originally surveyed; thence east along said line to the line between sections thirty-two and thirty-three, township twenty-four, north, range ten, east; thence north to the northwest corner of section twenty-one, township twenty-four, north, range ten, east; thence east to the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943; thence in a northwesterly direction along said boundary line to its intersection with the north line of the Winnebago Indian reservation, in township twenty-seven, north, range ten, east; thence west along the north line of said reservation to an intersection with the line between sections thirty-three and thirty-four, township twenty-seven, north, range six, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township twenty-seven, north, range six, east; thence west to the west boundary of said Winnebago Indian reservation; and thence south along the west line of the Winnebago and Omaha Indian reservations to the place of beginning.

Laws 1889, c. 3, § 1, p. 71;

R.S.1913, § 902;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 11, p. 828;

C.S.1922, § 804;

C.S.1929, § 25-191;

R.S.1943, § 22-187;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 7, p. 214.